Hawaii statutes.
§428-808 Notice; other claims against
dissolved limited liability company. (a) A dissolved limited liability
company that intends to terminate may publish notice of its intent to terminate
and request persons having claims against the company to present them in
accordance with the notice.

(b) The notice shall:

(1) Be published at least once in each of four
successive weeks (four publications) in a daily or weekly publication of
statewide circulation or in separate daily or weekly publications whose combined
circulation is statewide;

(2) Describe the information required to be contained
in a claim and provide a mailing address where the claim is to be sent; and

(3) State that a claim against the limited liability
company is barred unless a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced within
two years after the later of the last publication date of the notice or the
date of filing of the articles of termination.

(c) If a dissolved limited liability company
publishes a notice in accordance with subsection (b), the claim of each of the
following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences a proceeding to
enforce the claim against the dissolved company within two years after the
later of the last publication date of the notice or the date of filing of the
articles of termination:

(1) A claimant who did not receive written notice
under section 428-807;

(2) A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the
dissolved company but not acted on; and

(3) A claimant whose claim is contingent or based on
an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

(d) A claim not barred under this section may
be enforced:

(1) Against the dissolved limited liability company,
to the extent of its undistributed assets; or

(2) If the assets have been distributed in
liquidation, against a member of the dissolved company to the extent of the
member's proportionate share of the claim or the company's assets distributed
to the member in liquidation, whichever is less; provided that a member's total
liability for all claims under this section may not exceed the total amount of
assets distributed to the member. [L 1996, c 92, pt of §1; am L 2000, c 219,
§76; am L 2001, c 129, §96]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next